Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.120

Provisions exclusive—Local government licensing.

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to the regulation of private elder and vulnerable adult referral agencies are exclusive.

(2) This chapter may not be construed to affect or reduce the authority of any political subdivision of the state of Washington to provide for the licensing of private elder and vulnerable adult referral agencies solely for revenue purposes.

[ 2011 c 357 s 13.]